Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-570
Organization; validity; hearing.

All cases in which there may arise a question of the validity of the organization of a reclamation district, or a question of the validity of any proceeding under sections 46-501 to 46-573 shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern, and heard at the earliest practicable moment. The courts shall be open at all times for the purposes of sections 46-501 to 46-573.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 36, p. 557.